Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I CROP PRODUCTION PART A APPLICATION OF NUTRIENTS Section 1. Section 6A.21, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) âAgricultural landâ means real property owned by a person in tracts of ten acres or more and not laid off into lots of less than ten acres or divided by streets and alleys into parcels of less than ten acres, and that has been used for Senate File 632, p. 2 the production of agricultural commodities during three out of the past five years. Such use of property includes , but is not limited to , the raising, harvesting, handling, drying, or storage of crops used for feed, food, seed, or fiber; the care or feeding of livestock; the handling or transportation of crops or livestock; the storage, treatment, or disposal of livestock manure; and the application of fertilizers, soil conditioners beneficial substances , pesticides, and herbicides on crops. Agricultural land (2) âAgricultural landâ includes land on which is located farm residences or outbuildings used for agricultural purposes and land on which is located facilities, structures, or equipment for agricultural purposes. Agricultural land (3) âAgricultural landâ includes land taken out of agricultural production for purposes of environmental protection or preservation. Sec. 2. Section 190C.22, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. A sworn statement by the state chemist bureau chief of the Iowa laboratory bureau or the state chemistâs bureau chiefâs deputy stating the results of an analysis of a sample taken from a lot of agricultural products shall constitute prima facie evidence of the correctness of the analysis of that lot in a contested case proceeding or court proceeding. Sec. 3. Section 200.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.3 Definitions of words and terms . When As used in this chapter , unless the context otherwise requires : 1. âAmmonium nitrateâ means a compound that is chiefly composed of ammonium salt of nitric acid which contains not less than thirty-three percent nitrogen, one-half of which is in the ammonium form and one-half in the nitrate form. 2. The term âanhydrous ammoniaâ âAnhydrous ammoniaâ means the compound formed by the combination of two gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the proportion of one part nitrogen to three parts hydrogen by volume. 3. âAnhydrous ammonia plantâ means a facility used for the manufacture or distribution of the compound formed by the Senate File 632, p. 3 combination of two gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the proportion of one part nitrogen to three parts hydrogen by volume. 4. a. âBeneficial substanceâ means any substance or compound, other than primary, secondary, and microplant nutrients, that can be demonstrated by scientific research to be beneficial to one or more species of plants, soils, or media, including any of the following: (1) A plant amendment. (2) A plant biostimulant. (3) A plant inoculant. (4) A soil-amending ingredient. (5) A soil-amending ingredient form. (6) A soil amendment. (7) A soil inoculant. (8) Compost. b. âBeneficial substanceâ does not include a pesticide. 5. The term âbrandâ âBrandâ means a term, design, or trademark used in connection with one or several grades of commercial fertilizer , product name, or other specific designation under which a individual beneficial substance or commercial fertilizer is offered for sale . 5. The term âbulk fertilizerâ shall mean commercial fertilizer delivered to the purchaser in the solid, liquid, or gaseous state, in a nonpackaged form to which a label cannot be attached. 6. âBulkâ means in a nonpackaged form to which a label cannot be attached. 7. The term âcommercial fertilizerâ âCommercial fertilizerâ includes fertilizer and fertilizer materials and fertilizer-pesticide mixtures. 8. âCompostâ means a product manufactured through the controlled aerobic, biological decomposition of a biodegradable material if the product has undergone mesophilic and thermophilic temperatures that significantly reduce the viability of pathogens and weed seeds and stabilize carbon to the extent that the product is beneficial to plant growth. 7. 9. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land stewardship. Senate File 632, p. 4 10. âDistributeâ means to import, consign, manufacture, produce, compound, mix, blend, or offer for sale, sell, barter, or otherwise supply a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance in this state. 8. 11. The term âdistributorâ âDistributorâ means any person who imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, or blends commercial fertilizer , or who offers for sale, sells, barters, or otherwise distributes , a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance in this state. 9. 12. a. âEstablished date of operationâ means the date on which an anhydrous ammonia plant commenced operating. b. If the physical facilities of the plant are subsequently expanded, the established date of operation for each expansion is deemed to be a separate and independent âestablished date of operationâ established as of the date of commencement of the expanded operations. c. The commencement of expanded operations does not divest the plant of a previously established date of operation. 10. 13. âEstablished date of ownershipâ means the date of the recording of an appropriate instrument of title establishing the ownership of real estate. 11. 14. The term âfertilizerâ âFertilizerâ means any substance containing one or more recognized plant nutrient which is nutrients used for its plant nutrient content and which is designed for use and claimed to have value in promoting plant growth except unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures or calcium and magnesium carbonate materials used primarily for correcting soil acidity. 12. 15. The term âfertilizer materialâ âFertilizer materialâ means any substance used as a fertilizer or for compounding a fertilizer containing one or more of the recognized plant nutrients which are used for promoting plant growth or altering plant composition. 13. 16. The term âgradeâ âGradeâ means the percentages of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or P 2 O 5 or both, and soluble potassium or K 2 O or both stated in whole numbers in same terms, order , and percentages as in the âguaranteed analysisâ guaranteed analysis . 14. Guaranteed analysis: Senate File 632, p. 5 17. a. (1) The term âguaranteed analysisâ shall mean âGuaranteed analysisâ means the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed and reported as Total Nitrogen (N), Available Phosphorus (P) or P 2 O 5 or both, Soluble Potassium (K) or K 2 O or both and in the following form: Total Nitrogen (N) ... percent Available Phosphorus (P) or P 2 O 5 or both ... percent Soluble Potassium (K) or K 2 O or both ... percent (2) Registration and guarantee of water soluble phosphorus (P) or (P 2 O 5 ) shall be permitted. b. The term âguaranteed analysisâ âGuaranteed analysisâ , in the form specified in paragraph âaâ , includes all of the following : (1) (a) For unacidulated mineral phosphatic materials and basic slag, both total and available phosphorus or P 2 O 5 or both and the degree of fineness. (b) For bone tankage and other organic phosphatic materials, total phosphorus or P 2 O 5 or both. (2) When any additional plant nutrient elements contained in a beneficial substance as identified in subsection 10 of this section , are claimed in writing, they shall be identified in the guarantee, expressed as the element, and shall be subject to inspection and analysis in accordance with the methods and regulations that may be prescribed by the association of official agricultural chemists. 18. âLabelâ means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container or statement accompanying a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance. 19. âLabelingâ means the advertising or promotion of any commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance including but not limited to any written, printed, graphic, or electronic communication used in promoting the sale of a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance. 15. 20. âLicenseeâ means a person licensed under section 200.4 . 16. 21. âNuisanceâ means public or private nuisance as defined by statute or by the common law. 17. 22. âNuisance action or proceedingâ means an action, claim or proceeding brought at law, in equity, or as an Senate File 632, p. 6 administrative proceeding, which is based on nuisance. 18. 23. The term âofficial sampleâ âOfficial sampleâ means any sample of commercial fertilizer taken by the secretary or the secretaryâs agent. 19. âOrganic agricultural productâ means the same as defined in section 190C.1 . 20. 24. âOwnerâ means the person holding record title to real estate, and includes both legal and equitable interest under recorded real estate contracts. 21. 25. The term âpercent or percentageâ âPercentâ or âpercentageâ means the percentage by weight. 22. 26. The term âpersonâ âPersonâ includes an individual, or a type of partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association, firm, and corporation formed or organized to do business in this state or authorized to do or transact business in this state . 23. 27. The term âpesticideâ as used in this chapter means âPesticideâ includes insecticides, miticides, nemacides, fungicides, herbicides , and any other substance used in pest control. 28. âPlant amendmentâ means any substance applied to a plant seed which is intended to improve growth, yield, product quality, reproduction, flavor, or other favorable characteristics of a plant except a fertilizer, soil amendment, agricultural liming material, animal manure, vegetable manure, pesticide, plant regulator, or other material which may be exempted by regulation. 29. âPlant biostimulantâ means a substance, microorganism, or mixture thereof, that, when applied to a seed, plant, the rhizosphere, soil, or other growth media, acts to support a plantâs natural nutrition processes independently of the biostimulantâs nutrient content and improves nutrient availability, uptake, or use efficiency, tolerance to abiotic stress, and consequent growth, development, quality, or yield. 30. âPlant inoculantâ means a product consisting of microorganisms to be applied to the plant or soil for the purpose of enhancing the availability or uptake of plant nutrients through the root system. 24. 31. âSecretaryâ means the secretary of agriculture. Senate File 632, p. 7 25. 32. The term âsellâ âSellâ or âsaleâ includes exchange. 26. 33. A âsoil conditionerâ is âSoil amendmentâ means any substance which when added to the soil or applied to plants will produce a favorable growth, yield or quality of crop or soil flora or fauna or other soil characteristics, other than or a mixture of substances which is intended to improve the physical, chemical, biochemical, biological, or other characteristic of the soil, except a fertilizer, recognized pesticide agricultural liming material , unmanipulated animal and manure, unmanipulated vegetable manures or calcium and magnesium carbonate materials used primarily for correcting soil acidity manure, pesticide, or any other material exempted by regulation . 34. âSoil inoculantâ means a microbial product that is applied to colonize the soil to benefit the soil chemistry, biology, or structure. 35. âSoil-amending ingredientâ means any substance which when applied to soil will improve the physical, chemical, biochemical, biological, or other characteristics of the soil. 36. âSoil-amending ingredient formâ means the chemical compound, such as salt, chelate, oxide, or acid, of an ingredient or the physical form of an ingredient. 27. 37. A âspecialty fertilizerâ is âSpecialty fertilizerâ means a commercial fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses , and nurseries , and may include commercial fertilizers used for research or experimental purposes. 28. 38. The term âtonâ âTonâ means a net weight of two thousand pounds avoirdupois. 29. 39. a. The term âunmanipulated manuresâ âUnmanipulated manuresâ means any substances composed primarily of excreta, plant remains, or mixtures of such substances which have not been processed in any manner other than dewatering. b. âUnmanipulated manuresâ includes unmanipulated animal manure or unmanipulated vegetable manure. 30. Words importing the singular number may extend and be applied to several persons or things, and words importing the plural number may include the singular. Senate File 632, p. 8 Sec. 4. Section 200.4, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.4 License ââ fee and expiration ââ mixture requirement . 1. Any person who manufactures, mixes, blends, mixes to customerâs order, offers for sale, sells, or distributes any fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance in this state must first obtain a license issued by the secretary and pay a twenty dollar license fee for each place of manufacture or distribution from which fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance products are sold or distributed in this state. The license shall expire on July 1 of the even-numbered year following the date the license is issued. A license may be renewed for a two-year period as provided by the department. 2. The licensee shall at all times produce an intimate and uniform mixture of fertilizers or soil conditioners beneficial substances . When two or more fertilizer materials are delivered in the same load, they shall be thoroughly and uniformly mixed unless they are in separate compartments. Sec. 5. Section 200.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.5 Registration. 1. Each brand and grade of commercial fertilizer and each soil conditioner beneficial substance shall be registered before being offered for sale, sold , or otherwise distributed in this state; except that a commercial fertilizer formulated according to special specifications furnished by a consumer to fill the consumerâs order shall not be required to be registered, but shall be labeled as provided in section 200.6, subsection 3 1, paragraph âcâ . The application for registration shall be submitted to the secretary on forms furnished by the secretary and shall be accompanied by a label setting forth the guaranteed analysis which shall be the same as that appearing on the registered product. 2. All A registration will shall be permanent, provided, however, that the secretary may request a listing of products to be currently manufactured. The application shall include the following information in the following order: a. Net weight, if sold in packaged form. b. Name and address of the registrant. Senate File 632, p. 9 c. Name of product. d. Brand. e. Grade , if the product contains a recognized plant food . f. Guaranteed analysis. 3. In addition to the information required in subsection 2 of this section , applications an application for the registration of soil conditioners a beneficial substance must include the name or chemical designation and percentage of content of each of the active ingredients. Each microbial organism ingredient must be identified with species and genus in colony-forming units per gram for a dry product or per milliliter for a liquid product. Another unit of quantity may be acceptable if an accurate and verifiable guarantee is presented. 4. The secretary is authorized , after public hearing, following due notice, to adopt rules under chapter 17A regulating the labeling and registration of specialty commercial fertilizers and other fertilizer products beneficial substances , when necessary in the secretaryâs opinion. The secretary may require any reasonable information in addition to section 200.3, subsection 14 17 , which is necessary and useful to the purchasers of specialty fertilizers commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances of this state and to promote uniformity among states. 5. The secretary is authorized after public hearing, following due notice, to establish adopt rules under chapter 17A establishing minimum acceptable levels of trace and secondary elements components recognized as effective to aid crops produced in Iowa this state and to require such warning statements as may be deemed necessary to prevent injury to crops or for user safety . 6. The secretary, whenever the secretary deems it necessary in the administration of this chapter , may require the submission of additional data about any article, including a fertilizer , beneficial substance, or other product regulated under this chapter to support the claims made for it. If it appears to the secretary that the composition of the article is such as to warrant the claims made for it, and if the article, its labeling and other material required to be submitted, Senate File 632, p. 10 comply with the requirements of this chapter , the secretary shall register the product. 7. If it does not appear to the secretary that the article is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it, or if the article and its labeling and other material required to be submitted does do not comply with the a provision of this chapter , the secretary shall notify the registrant of the manner in which the article, labeling, or other material required to be submitted fails to comply with this chapter so as to afford the registrant an opportunity to make the necessary corrections before resubmitting the label. 8. It shall be the responsibility of the registrant to submit satisfactory evidence of favorable effects and safety of the product. 9. The secretary shall establish minimum requirements for the registration of fertilizers and soil conditioners beneficial substances by efficacy testing or the substantiation of data relevant to Iowa this stateâs crops and soils. 10. A distributor shall not be required to register any brand and grade of commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance which is already registered under this chapter by another person. 11. The advisory committee created in section 206.23 shall advise and assist the secretary on the registration of a product of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner under the provisions of this chapter . Sec. 6. Section 200.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.6 Labeling. 1. a. Any commercial fertilizer offered for sale or sold or distributed in this state in bags , or other containers , shall have placed on or affixed to the container in legibly written or printed form, the information required by section 200.5 , subsection 2 ; , either on tags affixed to the end of the package or directly on the package. 2. b. If distributed in bulk, the a shipment of commercial fertilizer must be accompanied by a written or printed statement giving the purchaserâs name and address in addition to the labeling requirement set forth in section 200.5 , Senate File 632, p. 11 subsection 2 . 3. c. A commercial fertilizer formulated according to specifications which are furnished by a consumer prior to mixing shall be labeled to show the net weight, guaranteed analysis, and the name and address of the distributor and may show the net weight and guaranteed analysis of each of the fertilizer materials or soil conditioners used. It is the responsibility of the distributor to mix these materials uniformly and intimately so that when sampled in the prescribed manner the resulting analysis would meet the guarantee. 4. d. All bulk bins or intermediate storage of bulk commercial fertilizer where being offered for sale or distributed direct to the consumer shall be labeled showing brand, name , and grade of product. 5. e. All fertilizers distributed or stored in bulk, unless in the manufacturers authorized containers, shall be labeled as the responsibility of the possessor. 6. 2. Soil conditioners A beneficial substance shall be labeled in accordance with subsection 1 of this section and in addition shall show the name or chemical designation and content or the active ingredients. Sec. 7. Section 200.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.8 Inspection fees. 1. a. There shall be paid by the licensee to the secretary for all any commercial fertilizers and soil conditioners fertilizer or beneficial substance sold , or distributed in this state, an inspection fee to be fixed annually by the secretary of agriculture at not more than twenty cents per ton. Sales The sale of a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance for manufacturing purposes only are hereby is exempted from fees an inspection fee but must still be reported showing the manufacturer who purchased same it . Payment of said the inspection fee by any licensee shall exempt all other persons, firms , or corporations from the payment thereof. b. On an individual packages package of specialty a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance containing twenty-five pounds or less, there shall be paid by the manufacturer in lieu of the semiannual inspection fee as set Senate File 632, p. 12 forth in this chapter , an annual registration and inspection fee of one hundred dollars for each brand and grade sold or distributed in the state. In the event that any manufacturer sells specialty a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance in packages a package of twenty-five pounds or less and also in packages a package of more than twenty-five pounds, this annual registration and inspection fee shall apply only to that portion sold in packages a package of twenty-five pounds or less, and that portion sold in packages a package of more than twenty-five pounds shall be subject to the same inspection fee as fixed by the secretary of agriculture as provided in this chapter . c. Any person other than a manufacturer who annually offers for sale, sells, or distributes specialty fertilizer in the amount of four thousand pounds or more or applies specialty fertilizer for compensation shall pay an annual inspection fee of thirty dollars in lieu of the semiannual inspection fee as set forth in this chapter . 2. Every person who is a licensee and any person required to pay an annual registration and inspection fee under this chapter in this state shall do all of the following : a. File not later than the last day of January and July of each year, on forms furnished by the secretary, a semiannual statement setting forth the number of net tons of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioners beneficial substance distributed in this state by grade for each county during the preceding six-month period ; and upon . Upon filing such the semiannual statement , the person shall pay the inspection fee at the rate stated in subsection 1 . However, in lieu of the semiannual statement by grade for each county, on individual packages of specialty fertilizer containing twenty-five pounds or less of commercial fertilizer , the registrant shall file not later than the last day of July of each year, on forms furnished by the secretary, an annual statement setting forth the number of net tons of specialty commercial fertilizer distributed in this state by grade during the preceding twelve-month period. b. If the tonnage report is not filed or the payment of inspection fees, or both, is not made within ten days after Senate File 632, p. 13 the last day of January and July of each year as required in paragraph âaâ of this subsection , a penalty amounting to ten percent of the amount due, if any, shall be assessed against the licensee. In any case, the penalty shall be no less than fifty dollars. The amount of fees due, if any, and penalty shall constitute a debt and become the basis of a judgment against the licensee. 3. If there is an unencumbered balance of funds from the amount of the fees deposited in the general fund pursuant to sections 200.9 and 201A.11 on June 30 of any fiscal year equal to or exceeding three hundred fifty thousand dollars, the secretary of agriculture shall reduce the per ton fee provided for in subsection 1 and the annual license fee established pursuant to section 201A.3 for the next fiscal year in such amount as will result in an ending estimated balance of such funds for June 30 of the next fiscal year of three hundred fifty thousand dollars. 4. 3. In addition to the fees imposed under subsection 1 , a groundwater protection fee shall be imposed upon nitrogen-based fertilizer. The fee shall be based upon the percentage of actual nitrogen contained in the product. An eighty-two percent nitrogen solution shall be taxed at a rate of seventy-five cents per ton. Other nitrogen-based product formulations shall be taxed on the percentage of actual nitrogen contained in the formulations with the eighty-two percent nitrogen solution serving as the base. The fee shall be paid by each licensee registering to sell fertilizer to the secretary of agriculture. The fees collected shall be deposited in the agriculture management account of the groundwater protection fund. The secretary of agriculture shall adopt rules for the payment, filing, and collection of groundwater protection fees from licensees in conjunction with the collection of registration and inspection fees. The secretary shall, by rule, allow an exemption to the payment of this fee for fertilizers which contain trace amounts of nitrogen. Sec. 8. Section 200.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.10 Inspection, sampling, and analysis. Senate File 632, p. 14 1. It shall be the duty of the secretary, who may act through an authorized agent, to sample, inspect, make analysis of, and test commercial fertilizers or soil conditioners beneficial substances distributed within this state at time and place and to such an extent as the secretary may deem necessary, to determine whether such commercial fertilizers and soil conditioners or beneficial substances are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter . In the performance of the foregoing duty, the secretary shall counsel may consult with the director of the Iowa agricultural experimental station in respect to the time, place , and extent of sampling. The secretary acting individually or through an agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or conveyances during regular business hours in order to have access to a commercial fertilizers fertilizer or soil conditioners beneficial substance subject to the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations pertaining thereto including in rules adopted by the department under this chapter . It shall be the duty of the The secretary to shall maintain a laboratory with the necessary equipment and to employ such employees as may be necessary to aid assist in the administration and enforcement of this chapter . 2. a. The methods of sampling and analysis shall be the official methods of the association of official agricultural chemists in all cases where methods have been adopted by the association. b. The findings of the state chemist or the state chemistâs bureau chief of the Iowa laboratory bureau, or the bureau chiefâs deputy, as shown by the sworn statement of the results of analysis of official samples of any brand and grade of commercial fertilizer, fertilizer material , or soil conditioner beneficial substance , shall constitute prima facie evidence of their its correctness in the courts of this state, as to the particular lots sampled and analyzed. 3. The secretary, in determining for administrative purposes whether any commercial fertilizer is deficient in plant food, or soil conditioner beneficial substance deficient in guaranteed active ingredients, shall be guided by the official sample as defined in section 200.3, subsection 18 23 , Senate File 632, p. 15 and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsection 2 of this section . 4. The results of official analysis of any commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance which has been found to be in violation of any provision of this chapter , shall be forwarded by the secretary to the registrant. Upon request, the secretary shall furnish to the registrant a portion of any sample. Sec. 9. Section 200.11, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.11 Filler material Item that is injurious or filler . It shall be unlawful for any person to A person shall not manufacture, offer for sale , or sell in this state, any commercial fertilizer , or soil conditioner beneficial substance containing any substance used as a filler item that is injurious to crop growth or deleterious to the soil, or to use in such commercial fertilizer , or soil conditioner beneficial substance as a filler any substance item that contains inert or useless plant food material for the purpose or with the effect of deceiving or defrauding the purchaser. Sec. 10. Section 200.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.12 False or misleading statements. A commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance is misbranded if it does not identify substances items promoting plant growth as defined in section 200.3, subsection 11 , or if it carries any false or misleading statement upon or attached to the container or stated on the invoice or delivery ticket, or if the container or on the invoice or delivery ticket or in any advertising matter whatsoever connected with, accompanying , or associated with the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance . Further, the burden of proof of the desirable effect of the product commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance on plant growth shall be the responsibility of the registrant. Sec. 11. Section 200.14, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.14 Rules. 1. a. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter Senate File 632, p. 16 17A providing minimum general safety standards for the design, construction, location, installation, and operation of equipment for storage, handling, transportation by tank truck or tank trailer, and utilization of fertilizers and soil conditioners a fertilizer or beneficial substance . b. The rules shall be such as are reasonably necessary for the protection and safety of the public and persons using fertilizers or soil conditioners a fertilizer or beneficial substance , and shall be in substantial conformity with the generally accepted standards of safety. c. Fertilizer and soil conditioner or beneficial substance equipment shall be installed and maintained in a safe operating condition and in conformity with rules adopted by the department. 2. The department may adopt such reasonable rules as may be necessary in order to carry into effect the purpose, and to secure the efficient administration, of this chapter . 3. This chapter does not prohibit the use of storage tanks smaller than transporting tanks nor the transfer of all kinds any kind of fertilizers fertilizer or soil conditioners beneficial substance directly from transporting tanks to implements of husbandry, if proper safety precautions are observed. 4. Rules adopted to implement this chapter are not subject to section 17A.7, subsection 2 or 3 . Sec. 12. Section 200.15, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.15 Refusal to register or cancellation of registration and licenses. 1. Upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant or licensee has used fraudulent or deceptive practices or has willfully violated any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated adopted under this chapter , the secretary is authorized and empowered to do any of the following: a. Cancel the registration of any product of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance or license. b. Refuse to register any product of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance . Senate File 632, p. 17 c. Refuse to license any applicant. 2. However, a A registration or license shall not be revoked or refused until the registrant or licensee has been given the opportunity to appear for a hearing by the secretary. Sec. 13. Section 200.16, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.16 âStop saleâ orders. The secretary may issue and enforce a written or printed âstop sale, use or removalâ order to the owner or custodian of any lot of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance , if the secretary finds the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or including any of the rules and regulations promulgated rule adopted under this chapter . The secretary may hold the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance at a designated place until the law has been complied with and the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance is released in writing by the secretary, or the violation has been otherwise legally disposed of by written authority, and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the withdrawal have been paid. Sec. 14. Section 200.17, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.17 Seizure, condemnation, and sale. Any lot of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the secretary to a court of competent jurisdiction in the county or adjoining county in which the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance is located. In the event the court finds the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance to be in violation of this chapter and orders or an order for the condemnation of the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance , it the commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance and the laws of the state. However, in no instance shall the Senate File 632, p. 18 disposition of the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance shall not be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance or for permission to reprocess or relabel the commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance to bring it into compliance with this chapter . Sec. 15. Section 200.18, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. If it shall appear from the examination of any commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance or any anhydrous ammonia installation, equipment, or operation that any of the provisions a provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations issued , including any rule adopted under this chapter , have been violated, the secretary shall cause notice of the violations to be given to the registrant, distributor, or possessor from whom said sample was taken ; any . The person so notified shall be given opportunity to be heard under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the secretary. If it appears after such hearing, either in the presence or absence of the person so notified, that any of the provisions provision of this chapter or rules and regulations issued , including a rule adopted under this chapter have , has been violated, the secretary may certify the facts to the proper prosecuting attorney. Sec. 16. Section 200.19, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200.19 Exchanges between manufacturers. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers or soil conditioners beneficial substances to each other by importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix fertilizer materials for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipments of commercial fertilizer or soil conditioner to manufacturers or manipulators who have registered their brands as required by the provisions of this chapter . Sec. 17. Section 200.20, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. Subsection 1 shall does not apply to any of the Senate File 632, p. 19 following: a. A specialty fertilizer. b. A fertilizer designed to be applied and ordinarily applied directly to growing plant foliage to stimulate further growth. c. Compost materials to be applied on land, if any of the following apply: (1) The land is being used to produce an agricultural commodity that is an organic agricultural product as provided in chapter 190C , including rules adopted by the department under that chapter. (2) The land is in the transition of being used to produce an agricultural commodity that is an organic agricultural product, pursuant to rules adopted by the department as provided in chapter 190C . Sec. 18. Section 200.22, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. The provisions of this chapter and rules adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter shall preempt local legislation adopted by a local governmental entity relating to the use, sale, distribution, storage, transportation, disposal, formulation, labeling, registration, or manufacture of a fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance . A local governmental entity shall not adopt or continue in effect local legislation relating to the use, sale, distribution, storage, transportation, disposal, formulation, labeling, registration, or manufacture of a fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance , regardless of whether a statute or rule adopted by the department applies to preempt the local legislation. Local legislation in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. Sec. 19. Section 200A.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 200A.2 Purpose. The purpose of this chapter is to regulate certain bulk dry animal manure for use as a fertilizer or soil conditioner beneficial substance , which is unmanipulated and therefore not subject to regulation under chapter 200 . Sec. 20. Section 202.1, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended Senate File 632, p. 20 to read as follows: 12. âProduceâ means to do any of the following: a. Provide feed or services relating to as part of the livestockâs care and feeding of livestock . If the livestock is dairy cattle, âproduceâ includes milking the dairy cattle and storing raw milk at the contract producerâs contract livestock facility. b. Provide for planting, raising, harvesting, and storing a crop. âProduceâ includes preparing the soil for planting and nurturing the crop by the application of fertilizers a fertilizer or soil conditioners beneficial substance as defined in section 200.3 or pesticides a pesticide as defined in section 206.2 . Sec. 21. Section 206.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. For the purpose of this chapter , fertilizers a fertilizer in a mixed fertilizer-pesticide formulations formulation or a beneficial substance in a beneficial substance-pesticide formulation shall be considered as an inert ingredients ingredient . Sec. 22. Section 321.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. âAgricultural hazardous materialâ means a hazardous material, other than hazardous waste, whose end use directly supports the production of an agricultural commodity, including , but not limited to , a fertilizer, pesticide, soil conditioner beneficial substance , or fuel. b. âAgricultural hazardous materialâ is limited to material in class 3, 8, or 9, division 2.1, 2.2, 5.1, or 6.1, or an ORM-D material as defined in 49 C.F.R. Â§171.8 . Sec. 23. Section 403.17, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. a. âAgricultural landâ means real property owned by a person in tracts of ten acres or more and not laid off into lots of less than ten acres or divided by streets and alleys into parcels of less than ten acres, and that has been used for the production of agricultural commodities during three out of the past five years. Such use of property includes, but is not limited to, the raising, harvesting, handling, drying, Senate File 632, p. 21 or storage of crops used for feed, food, seed, or fiber; the care or feeding of livestock; the handling or transportation of crops or livestock; the storage, treatment, or disposal of livestock manure; and the application of fertilizers, soil conditioners beneficial substances , pesticides, and herbicides on crops. Agricultural land b. âAgricultural landâ includes land on which is located farm residences or outbuildings used for agricultural purposes and land on which is located facilities, structures, or equipment for agricultural purposes. Agricultural land c. âAgricultural landâ includes land taken out of agricultural production for purposes of environmental protection or preservation. Sec. 24. Section 455B.411, subsection 3, paragraph b, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) Agricultural wastes, including manures and crop residues that are returned to the soil as fertilizers or soil conditioners beneficial substances . Sec. 25. Section 455E.11, subsection 2, paragraph b, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: An agriculture management account. Moneys collected from the groundwater protection fee levied pursuant to section 200.8, subsection 4 3 , the portion of the fees collected pursuant to section 206.8, subsection 2 , and section 206.12, subsection 3 , and other moneys designated for the purpose of agriculture management shall be deposited in the agriculture management account. The agriculture management account shall be used for the following purposes: Sec. 26. Section 579B.1, subsection 14, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. Provide for planting, raising, harvesting, and storing a crop. âProduceâ includes preparing the soil for planting and nurturing the crop by the application of fertilizers a fertilizer or soil conditioners beneficial substance as defined in section 200.3 or pesticides a pesticide as defined in section 206.2 . Sec. 27. Section 716.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: Senate File 632, p. 22 2. a. âCritical infrastructure sabotageâ means an unauthorized and overt act intended to cause and having the means to cause, and in substantial furtherance of causing, a substantial and widespread interruption or impairment of a fundamental service rendered by the critical infrastructure. However, âcritical infrastructure sabotageâ b. âCritical infrastructure sabotageâ does not include an accidental interruption or impairment of service to the critical infrastructure caused by a person in the performance of the personâs work duties or caused by a personâs lawful activity. In addition, âcritical infrastructure sabotageâ does not include any condition or activity related to the production of farm products as defined in section 554.9102 , including but not limited to the discharge of agricultural stormwater; the construction or use of soil or water quality conservation practices or structures; the preparation of agricultural land and the raising, harvesting, drying, or storage of agricultural crops; the application of a fertilizer or beneficial substance as defined in section 200.3 , pesticides a pesticide as defined in section 206.2 , or manure as defined in section 459.102 ; the installation and use of agricultural drainage tile and systems; the construction, operation, or management of an animal feeding operation as defined in section 459.102 ; and the care, feeding, or watering of livestock. PART B APPLICATION OF PESTICIDES ââ CERTIFICATION Sec. 28. Section 206.5, subsection 7, paragraph b, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) The department shall may adopt by rule criteria for allowing a person required to be certified to complete either a written or oral examination. DIVISION II ANIMAL HEALTH PART A CONTROL OF INFECTIOUS OR CONTAGIOUS DISEASES AFFLICTING ANIMALS Sec. 29. Section 163.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 30. Section 163.1, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: Senate File 632, p. 23 3. Determine and employ the most efficient and practical means for the identification and control of an infectious or contagious disease afflicting animals that may threaten or actually threatens animals in this state . Sec. 31. NEW SECTION . 163.2B Rules. 1. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and enforce this chapter. 2. If the department determines that rules described in subsection 1 are required to be adopted and take effect on an emergency basis to prevent or control the outbreak of an infectious or contagious disease afflicting animals, the department may adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , to administer and enforce this chapter. The rules shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with this subsection shall also be published as a notice of intended action as provided in section 17A.4. Sec. 32. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. 1. The Code editor is directed to make the following transfers: a. Section 163.2A to section 163.3. b. Section 163.2B to section 163.2A. 2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the enactment of this section. Sec. 33. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor is directed to arrange the provisions of chapter 163, subchapter I, parts 1 and 2, as amended or enacted in this division of this Act, into the following parts: 1. Part 1, including sections 163.1 through 163.2A. 2. Part 2, including sections 163.3 through 163.5. PART B PRACTICE OF VETERINARY MEDICINE Sec. 34. Section 169.5, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9. A person who provides veterinary medical services, owns a veterinary clinic, or practices in this state shall obtain a certificate from the board and be subject to the same Senate File 632, p. 24 standards of conduct, as provided in this chapter and rules adopted by the board, as apply to a licensed veterinarian, unless the board determines that the same standards of conduct are inapplicable. The board shall issue, renew, or deny a certificate; adopt rules relating to the standards of conduct; and take disciplinary action against the person, including suspension or revocation of a certificate, in accordance with the procedures established in section 169.14 . Certification fees shall be established by the board pursuant to subsection 7 , paragraph âjâ . Fees Certification fees shall be established in an amount sufficient to fully offset the costs of certification pursuant to this subsection . F or the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30, 2002, the department shall retain fees collected to administer the program of certifying veterinary clinics and the fees retained are appropriated to the department for the purposes of this subsection . For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30, 2002, notwithstanding section 8.33 , fees which remain unexpended at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall be available for use for the following fiscal year to administer the program. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, and succeeding fiscal years, certification Certification fees shall be deposited in the general fund of the state and are appropriated to the department to administer the certification provisions of this subsection . This subsection shall not apply to an animal shelter, as defined in section 162.2 , that provides veterinary medical services to animals in the custody of the shelter. Sec. 35. Section 169.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 169.13 Discipline of licensees. 1. The board of veterinary medicine, after due notice and hearing, may revoke or suspend a license to practice veterinary medicine take disciplinary action against a licensee if it determines that a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine is guilty of violating any of the following acts or offenses: grounds for discipline in this section. 2. The board is authorized to discipline licensees in any Senate File 632, p. 25 of the following ways: a. Impose a civil penalty against the licensee in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars. If the board imposes a civil penalty, all of the following apply: (1) The collection of the civil penalty may be enforced in a civil action brought by the attorney general on behalf of the board. (2) Moneys collected in civil penalties shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. b. Revoke or suspend a license to practice veterinary medicine. 3. Any of the following actions or offenses constitutes grounds for discipline: a. Knowingly making a misleading, deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representation in the practice of the profession. b. Being convicted of a felony in the courts a court of this state or another state, territory, or country. Conviction as used in this paragraph includes a conviction of an offense which if committed in this state would be deemed a felony without regard to its designation elsewhere, or a criminal proceeding in which a finding or verdict of guilt is made or returned, but the adjudication or guilt is either withheld or not entered. A certified copy of the final order or judgment of conviction or plea of guilty in this state or in another state is conclusive evidence. c. Violating a statute or law of this state, another state, or the United States, without regard to its designation as either felony or misdemeanor, which if the statute or law relates to the practice of veterinary medicine. d. Having the personâs license to practice veterinary medicine revoked or suspended, or having other disciplinary action taken by a licensing authority of another state, territory, or country. A certified copy of the record or order of the suspension, revocation, or disciplinary action is conclusive or prima facie evidence. e. Knowingly aiding, assisting, procuring, or advising a person to unlawfully practice veterinary medicine. f. Being adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction. The adjudication shall automatically Senate File 632, p. 26 suspend a license for the duration of the license unless the board orders otherwise. g. Being guilty of a willful or repeated departure from, or the a failure to conform to, the minimal standard of acceptable and prevailing practice of veterinary medicine as defined in rules adopted by the board, in which proceeding actual injury to an animal need not be established; or the committing by a veterinarian of an act contrary to honesty, justice, or good morals, whether the act is committed in the course of the practice or otherwise, and whether committed within or without this state. h. Inability Demonstrating an inability to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness, drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or other type of material or as a result of a mental or physical condition. i. Willful Having willfully or repeated violation of repeatedly violated lawful rules adopted by the board or violation of a lawful order of the board, previously entered by the board in a disciplinary hearing. 2. 4. a. The board, upon probable cause, may compel a veterinarian to submit to a mental or physical examination by designated physicians. Failure of a veterinarian to submit to an examination constitutes an admission to the allegations made against that veterinarian and the finding of fact and decision of the board may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. At reasonable intervals, a veterinarian shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate that the veterinarian can resume the competent practice of veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety to animals. b. A person licensed to practice veterinary medicine who makes application applies for the renewal of the personâs license as required by section 169.12 gives consent to submit to a mental or physical examination as provided by this paragraph when directed in writing by the board. All objections shall be waived as to the admissibility of the examining physicianâs testimony or examination reports on the grounds that they constitute privileged communication. Senate File 632, p. 27 The medical testimony or examination reports shall not be used against a veterinarian in another proceeding and are confidential except for other actions filed against a veterinarian to revoke or suspend that personâs license. PART C COURT-ORDERED MANAGEMENT OF LIVESTOCK IN IMMEDIATE NEED OF SUSTENANCE Sec. 36. Section 717.4A, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 717.4A Livestock in immediate need of sustenance ââ livestock remediation fund. The department may utilize the moneys deposited into the livestock remediation fund pursuant to section 459.501 to pay for any expenses associated with providing sustenance to or the disposition of the livestock pursuant to a court order entered pursuant to section 717.3 or 717.5 . The department shall utilize moneys from the fund only to the extent that the department determines that expenses cannot be timely paid by utilizing the available provisions of sections 717.4 and 717.5 . The department shall deposit any unexpended and unobligated moneys in the fund. The department shall pay to the fund the proceeds from the disposition of the livestock and associated products less expenses incurred by the department in providing for the sustenance and disposition of the livestock, as provided in section 717.5 If there are proceeds remaining after the disposition of the livestock or associated products and satisfaction of the departmentâs expenses, and the department has utilized moneys from the livestock remediation fund, the department shall repay the fund from the proceeds . Sec. 37. Section 717.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If the court orders the disposition of the livestock that involves the livestockâs sale or transfer, the order shall be deemed as occurring by a receiver appointed pursuant to section 680.4. Sec. 38. Section 717.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If any moneys remain after satisfying the costs of the local authority or department, such moneys shall Senate File 632, p. 28 be distributed pursuant to the process and priorities contained in chapter 680. DIVISION III AGRICULTURAL PROCESSING Sec. 39. NEW SECTION . 189A.1A Objective. 1. It is the objective of this chapter to provide for meat and poultry products inspection programs that will impose and enforce requirements with respect to intrastate operations and commerce that are at least equal to those imposed and enforced under the federal Meat Inspection Act and the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act with respect to operations and transactions in interstate commerce. 2. The secretary is directed to administer this chapter so as to accomplish this objective. The bureau chief of the meat and poultry inspection bureau shall be designated as the secretaryâs delegate to be the appropriate state official to cooperate with the secretary of agriculture of the United States in administration of this chapter. Sec. 40. Section 189A.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land stewardship. NEW SUBSECTION . 29A. âSecretaryâ means the secretary of agriculture. Sec. 41. Section 189A.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 189A.3 License ââ fee. 1. a. A person shall not operate an establishment without first obtaining a license from the department. b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to any of the following: (1) A food establishment as defined in section 137F.1 . (2) A home food processing establishment as defined in section 137D.1. (2) (3) A person who slaughters, processes, or prepares livestock or poultry of the personâs own raising, exclusively for the personâs household, nonpaying guests, or nonpaying employees. 2. a. The license fee for each establishment per year or any part of a year shall be as follows : Senate File 632, p. 29 a. (1) For all meat and poultry slaughtered or otherwise prepared not exceeding twenty thousand pounds per year for sale, resale, or custom, twenty-five fifty dollars. b. (2) For all meat and poultry slaughtered or otherwise prepared in excess of twenty thousand pounds per year for sale, resale, or custom, fifty one hundred dollars. b. A license fee collected by the department shall be retained by the department as appropriated receipts for administration of this chapter. 3. a. The moneys shall be deposited with the department. The A license year shall be from July 1 to June 30 shall expire on July 1 of each odd-numbered year . Applications b. An application for licenses a license shall be in writing on forms a form prescribed by the department. 4. It is the objective of this chapter to provide for meat and poultry products inspection programs that will impose and enforce requirements with respect to intrastate operations and commerce that are at least equal to those imposed and enforced under the federal Meat Inspection Act and the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act with respect to operations and transactions in interstate commerce; and the secretary is directed to administer this chapter so as to accomplish this purpose. A director of the meat and poultry inspection service shall be designated as the secretaryâs delegate to be the appropriate state official to cooperate with the secretary of agriculture of the United States in administration of this chapter . Sec. 42. Section 189A.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: In order to accomplish the objectives objective of this chapter , the secretary may exempt the following types of operations from inspection: Sec. 43. Section 189A.5, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: In order to accomplish the objectives objective stated in section 189A.3 189A.1A, the secretary shall do any of the following : Sec. 44. Section 189A.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: Senate File 632, p. 30 In order to accomplish the objective stated in section 189A.3 189A.1A, the secretary may do any of the following : ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 632, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor